Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 578A.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. An occupant shall not use a leased space for residential purposes. An occupant who uses a leased space for residential purposes is immediately in default and the operator may limit the occupantâs access to the leased space to the hours which the office is open at the self-service storage facility and proceed in accordance with this chapter. Sec. 2. Section 578A.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 578A.6 Right Rental agreement ââ right to deny access due to default. 1. A rental agreement may be a written or oral agreement. If a written rental agreement is presented to a potential occupant by an operator and if the potential occupant takes possession of a leased space, or if an existing occupant retains possession of the leased space, a failure by the occupant to execute and deliver the written rental agreement to the operator within thirty days from the initial or renewed date of occupancy constitutes acceptance of the terms of the written rental agreement. House File 640, p. 2 2. If the occupant is in default for a reason other than nonpayment of rent, or if the operator does not renew the occupantâs rental agreement , the operator shall have deliver to the occupant a written notice or an electronic mail notice, if consented to by the parties in accordance with section 578A.5, subsection 5, to remove personal property from the leased space within fifteen days. During the fifteen-day period, the operator has the right to place reasonable restrictions on the occupantâs use of the leased space, including the right to deny or limit the occupant occupantâs access to the leased space to the hours which the office is open at the self-service storage facility if such right is set forth in the rental agreement. 3. If the occupant is in default for nonpayment of rent, the operator may deny the occupant access to the leased space at the self-service storage facility if such right is set forth in the rental agreement. 4. Any personal property remaining is subject to lien as provided in section 578A.5 and in accordance with section 578A.7. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 640, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor